District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.34

Partnership contributions.

(a)

A contribution by a partnership shall be attributed to each partner:

(1)

In direct proportion to his or her share of the partnership profits, according to instructions that shall be provided by the partnership to the political committee, political action committee, or candidate; or

(2)

By agreement of the partners, as long as:

(A)

Only the profits of the partners to whom the contribution is attributed are reduced (or losses increased); and

(B)

These partners’ profits are reduced (or losses increased) in proportion to the contribution attributed to each of them.

(b)

A contribution by a partnership shall not exceed the limitations on contributions pursuant to this part. No portion of such contribution may be made from the profits of a corporation that is a partner.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 334, 59 DCR 1862
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(r), 61 DCR 153
This section is referenced in § 1-1162.31.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 added “political action committee” in (a)(1).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).